apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!-- Kashubian -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaĄąÃãBbCcDdEeÉéËëFfGgHhIiJjKkLlŁłMmNnŃńOoÒòÓóÔôPpRrSsTtUuÙùWwYyZzŻżXxVvŹźĘęŔŕČčĎďĚěŠš</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="year"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="ppr"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    
    <sdef n="mp"/>
    <sdef n="ma"/>
    <sdef n="mi"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="nm"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="po"/>
    <sdef n="cpd"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    
    <sdef n="sg" c="Pòjedińczô lëczba"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Wielnô lëczba"/>
    <sdef n="du"/>
    
    <sdef n="nom" c="nazéwôcz"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="rodzôcz"/>
    <sdef n="dat" c="dôwôcz"/>
    <sdef n="acc" c="winowôcz"/>
    <sdef n="ins" c="narzãdzôcz"/>
    <sdef n="loc" c="môlnik"/>
    <sdef n="voc" c="wòłiwôcz"/>
    
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="nô__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>nô</l>
	  <r>nô<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ë__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="że__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bò__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="do__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="téż__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jak__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chùtkò__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chùtczi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nôchùtczi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="I__num">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="X__num">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wiki__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="km__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gòdz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <i>1</i>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[2-4]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[5-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9][0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__wiele">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wiel/e__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiele"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wiel/e__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiele"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ë"><i>ë</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ani"><i>ani</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ale"><i>ale</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="ë__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="że"><i>że</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="żebë"><i>żebë</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bë"><i>bë</i><par n="że__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bò"><i>bò</i><par n="bò__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="abò"><i>abò</i><par n="bò__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="jeżle"><i>jeżle</i><par n="bò__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="wiele"><i>wiel</i><par n="wiel/e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="wiele"><i>wiel</i><par n="wiel/e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="I"><i>I</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI"><i>VI</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV"><i>XIV</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII"><i>XVIII</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXII"><i>XXII</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXVI"><i>XXVI</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXX"><i>XXX</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXXIV"><i>XXXIV</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XXXVIII"><i>XXXVIII</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="L"><i>L</i><par n="X__num"/></e>
    <e lm="òd" r="LR"><i>òd</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="òd" r="RL"><p><l><a/>òd</l><r>òd</r></p><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pòd" r="LR"><i>pòd</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nad" r="LR"><p><l>nade</l><r>nad</r></p><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="w" r="RL"><p><l><a/>w</l><r>w</r></p><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bez" r="LR"><i>bez</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ù"><i>ù</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przez"><i>przez</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="midze"><i>midze</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="òkróm"><i>òkróm</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wicy jak"><i>wicy<b/>jak</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wiki"><i>wiki</i><par n="wiki__n"/></e>
    <e lm="org"><i>org</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="km"><i>km</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kg"><i>kg</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cm"><i>cm</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nr"><i>nr</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sw"><i>sw</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dr"><i>dr</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jpg"><i>jpg</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="GB"><i>GB</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hz"><i>Hz</i><par n="km__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gòdz"><i>gòdz</i><par n="gòdz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jak"><i>jak</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czedë"><i>czedë</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gdze"><i>gdze</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dze"><i>dze</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czë"><i>czë</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czej"><i>czej</i><par n="jak__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="p.n.s"><i>p.n.s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="n.p." c="never sentence final, eat the full stop"><i>n.p.</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="doma"><i>doma</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="baro"><i>baro</i><par n="chùtkò__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="baro"><p><l>barżi</l><r>baro</r></p><par n="chùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="baro"><p><l>nôbarżi</l><r>baro</r></p><par n="nôchùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czãsto"><i>czãsto</i><par n="chùtkò__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czãsto"><p><l>czãsczi</l><r>czãsto</r></p><par n="chùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="czãsto"><p><l>nôczãsczi</l><r>czãsto</r></p><par n="nôchùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dużo"><i>dużo</i><par n="chùtkò__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dużo"><p><l>wicy</l><r>dużo</r></p><par n="chùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dużo"><p><l>nôwicy</l><r>dużo</r></p><par n="nôchùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chùtkò"><i>chùtko</i><par n="chùtkò__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chùtkò"><p><l>chùtczi</l><r>chùtko</r></p><par n="chùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chùtkò"><p><l>nôchùtczi</l><r>chùtko</r></p><par n="nôchùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrze"><i>dobrze</i><par n="chùtkò__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrze"><p><l>lepi</l><r>dobrze</r></p><par n="chùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrze"><p><l>nôlepi</l><r>dobrze</r></p><par n="nôchùtczi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="znowù"><i>znowù</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nielùso"><i>nielùso</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tak"><i>tak</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="II s"><i>II<b/>s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="X s"><i>X<b/>s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII s"><i>XVIII<b/>s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="XXVI s"><i>XXVI<b/>s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="L s"><i>L<b/>s</i><par n="téż__adv"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
